Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.050

Exception for exigent circumstances.

A custodial interrogation to which RCW 10.122.030 otherwise applies need not be recorded electronically if recording is not feasible because of exigent circumstances. The law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation shall record electronically an explanation of the exigent circumstances before conducting the interrogation, if feasible, or as soon as practicable after the interrogation is completed.

[ 2021 c 329 s 5.]